Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202575-393
Unified carrier registration plan and agreement; director; powers.

The director may participate in the unified carrier registration plan and agreement pursuant to the Unified Carrier Registration Act of 2005, 49 U.S.C. 13908, as the act existed on January 1, 2025, and may file on behalf of this state the plan required by such plan and agreement for enforcement of the act in this state.

Laws 2007, LB358, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 19;

Laws 2011, LB212, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 52;

Laws 2013, LB35, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB776, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB313, § 10;

Laws 2016, LB929, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 93;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 126;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 26;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 84;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 25;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 84;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 56;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 65;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 63.